Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1615
Act; permit; how construed.

The Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act and any issuance of a permit under the act shall not be construed to:

(1) Prejudice the rights of property owners within a storage facility to exercise rights that have not been committed to a storage facility;

(2) Prevent a mineral owner or mineral lessee from drilling through or near a storage reservoir to explore for and develop minerals if the drilling, production, and related activities comply with commission requirements that preserve the storage facility's integrity and protect the objectives of the act; or

(3) Amend or alter any statute, rule, or regulation in effect on August 28, 2021, which relates to the commission's authority to regulate operations to increase ultimate recovery from a pool as defined in section 57-903, including, but not limited to, the introduction of carbon dioxide into a pool.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 15.
August 28, 2021